Utah statutes.
17-22-5.   Sheriff's classification of jail inmates -- Classification
criteria -- Alternative incarceration programs -- Limitation.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (4), the sheriff shall adopt and
implement written policies for admission of prisoners to the county jail and
the classification of persons incarcerated in the jail which shall provide for
the separation of prisoners by gender and by such other factors as may
reasonably provide for the safety and well-being of inmates and the community.
To the extent authorized by law, any written admission policies shall be
applied equally to all entities using the county correctional facilities.
(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (4), each county sheriff shall assign
prisoners to a facility or section of a facility based on classification
criteria that the sheriff develops and maintains.
(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (4), a county sheriff may develop
and implement alternative incarceration programs that may or may not involve
housing a prisoner in a jail facility.
(b)  A prisoner housed under an alternative incarceration program under
Subsection (3)(a) shall be considered to be in the full custody and control of
the sheriff for purposes of Section 76-8-309.
(c)  A prisoner may not be placed in an alternative incarceration program
under Subsection (3)(a) unless:
(i)  the jail facility is at maximum operating capacity, as established under
Subsection 17-22-5.5(2); or
(ii)  ordered by the court.
(4)   This section may not be construed to authorize a sheriff to modify
provisions of a contract with the Department of Corrections to house in a
county jail persons sentenced to the Department of Corrections.
